Utah statutes.
57-19-26.   Exemptions.
(1)  Unless entered into for the purpose of evading the provisions of this
chapter, the following transactions are exempt from registration:
(a)  isolated transactions by an owner of an interest in a project or by a
person holding such an owner's executed power of attorney;
(b)  an offer or sale by a governmental entity; and
(c)  a bona fide pledge of interest in a project.
(2)  The director may, by rule or order, exempt any person from any or all
requirements of this chapter if the director finds that the offering of an
interest in a project is essentially noncommercial.  For purposes of this
subsection, the offering of fewer than ten interests in a project is
considered essentially noncommercial.
